Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Abolition

§ 21-1-49.
Automatic by virtue of census results.

In the event any census taken under an act of congress shall show that any municipality contains less than fifty (50) inhabitants, then such municipality shall be automatically abolished and all its rights and powers as a municipal corporation shall thereupon cease. In such cases it shall be the duty of the secretary of state to make an appropriate notation on the records of such municipal corporation in his office showing that such municipal corporation has been abolished because of having less than fifty (50) inhabitants, and he shall forthwith send a notice to the municipal authorities advising them of such fact, and shall send a copy of the notice to the chancery clerk of the county in which such municipality is located. However, the failure of the secretary of state to make such notation or to send such notice shall not prevent the abolition of such municipal corporation as is herein provided, but such abolition shall result automatically from the fact that the census shows that such municipal corporation has less than fifty (50) inhabitants. Any municipality having not less than fifty (50) inhabitants and having heretofore been abolished under the federal census of 1970 by operation of language formerly employed in this section providing for such abolition should a municipality contain less than ninety-two (92) inhabitants, is hereby restored to all rights and privileges as a municipality after the most recent governing authority of the municipality gives notice to the secretary of state that such municipality desires to be restored to all rights and privileges as a municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2919; 1906, § 3310; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5806; 1930, § 2381; 1942, § 3374-21; Laws, 1920, ch. 319; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 21; Laws, 1962, ch. 536; Laws, 1973, ch. 318, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 513, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1981).

§ 21-1-51.
Automatic by failure to hold official meetings or municipal general election of officers.

Whenever the municipal authorities of any municipality shall fail to hold official meetings for a period of twelve consecutive months, or whenever municipal general elections of officers shall not be held in any municipal corporation as required by law upon two consecutive occasions, then such municipal corporation shall be automatically abolished, and its rights and powers as a municipal corporation shall cease and determine. The official minute book of the municipality shall be the sole evidence of whether any official meetings were held in such municipal corporation during any twelve month period, except in cases of fraud or falsification, and abolition of the municipality shall result automatically where the official minute book fails to show a record of any official meetings during such twelve month period. In cases of the failure to hold municipal general elections of officers on two consecutive occasions, the records in the office of the secretary of state as to whether or not returns of such elections were made to him as required by law shall be the sole evidence of whether such elections were held, except in cases of fraud, falsification, loss of such records or clear and patent mistake, oversight, or omission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2919; 1906, § 3310; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5807; 1930, § 2383; 1942, § 3374-22; Laws, 1910, ch. 199; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-1-53.
Voluntary.

Any municipal corporation having a population of less than one thousand inhabitants, according to the latest available federal census, may be abolished and dissolved in the manner hereinafter provided. In order to abolish or dissolve such a municipality, the mayor and board of aldermen, or other governing authorities of the municipality, shall first adopt an ordinance declaring their intention to abolish or dissolve such municipality, which ordinance shall set forth in full the reason or reasons why such municipality should be abolished and why the public convenience and necessity would be served by the abolition thereof. When such ordinance shall have been adopted, the municipal authorities shall file a petition in the chancery court in which such municipality is located, which said petition shall recite the fact of the adoption of such ordinance and shall pray that the said municipality be abolished and dissolved as provided in such ordinance. A certified copy of said ordinance shall be attached to said petition as an exhibit thereto. All the provisions of this chapter with regard to proceedings in chancery court on petitions for the creation, enlargement and contraction of municipalities shall apply in like manner to the proceedings for the abolition of a municipal corporation. Notice of the filing of said petition and the time for the hearing thereof shall be given in the manner and for the length of time as is required in cases of petitions for the creation, enlargement or contraction of municipalities. Parties aggrieved by the decree of the chancellor may appeal from such decree in the same manner and within the same time as is provided in cases of decrees on petitions involving the creation, enlargement or contraction of a municipal corporation. If the chancellor shall find from the evidence that the proposed abolition is reasonable and will serve the public convenience and necessity, he shall enter his decree declaring the said municipal corporation to be dissolved and abolished, and said decree shall become effective after the passage of ten days from the date thereof, except in cases of appeal in which cases the decree shall become effective after the passage of ten days from the final determination of the appeal. If the chancellor shall find from the evidence that the proposed abolition is unreasonable and is not required by the public convenience and necessity, he shall enter his decree denying such abolition. The hearing provided for herein may be held either in term time or in vacation.

Whenever a municipal corporation shall be so abolished, the chancery clerk shall, after the expiration of ten days from the date of such decree, if no appeal be taken therefrom, forward to the secretary of state a certified copy of such decree, which shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State and remain a permanent record thereof. The secretary of state shall note on his official records pertaining to such municipal corporation the fact that such corporation has been so abolished. In the event an appeal be taken from such decree and such decree be affirmed, then the certified copy thereof shall be forwarded to the secretary of state within ten days after the receipt of the mandate from the supreme court notifying the clerk of such affirmance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2919; 1906, § 3310; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5806; 1930, § 2381; 1942, §§ 3374-23, 3374-24; Laws, 1920, ch. 319; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, §§ 23, 24, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-1-55.
Records of municipality to be filed with chancery clerk.

Whenever a municipality is abolished under any of the provisions of this chapter, the municipal authorities shall deliver all records of such municipality to the chancery clerk of the county in which such municipality is located and said records shall be filed in the office of the chancery clerk and be kept by him as a public record.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-25; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-1-57.
Payment of indebtedness of municipality.

The abolition of a municipal corporation under any of the provisions of this chapter shall not relieve the property thereof of liability for the debts of the municipality, but the governing authorities of the municipality shall forthwith make up a statement of the indebtedness of the municipality, if any, and a statement of its assets, and shall certify the same and deliver such statement, together with the records of the municipality, to the chancery clerk of the county in which the municipality is located. The board of supervisors of the county shall levy a special tax upon the property embraced in such municipality so abolished, which shall be in force from year to year so long as may be necessary, and such tax shall be collected by the tax collector of the county. The tax collector shall deposit the funds derived from such levy in a special account in the county treasury, and the same shall be paid to the creditors of such municipality upon order and allowance of claims by the board of supervisors. When all of the indebtedness of the municipality shall have been paid, then such special levy shall be discontinued.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-25; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1950.